src/phonology/hdn-phon.twolc
! =================================== !
!! !!!The Northern Haida morphophonological/twolc rules file 
! =================================== !

!! !!Alphabet
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç ' ʼ . %-
 g̲ k̲ x̲

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
 G̲ K̲ X̲
 %  ! this is a space
 %>:0 	!!= * @CODE@ affix boundary
 %^WS:0    !!= * @CODE@ white space dummy
 %^DEF:0    !!= * @CODE@ white space dummy
 %^ENDA:0
 %^ENDB:0
 %^ENDC:0
 %^ENDD:0
 %^ENDE:0
 %^ENDF:0
 %^ENDG:0
 %^ENDH:0
 s2:s
 ú2:ú
 á2:á
 é2:é
 í2:í
 ú2:ú

;

!! !!Sets

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å  !!= * @CODE@
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã  ; !!= @CODE@
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ' ʼ ç ý ñ ; !!= * @CODE@
 Orth = . %- ; 
 Endings = %^DEF %^ENDA  %^ENDB  %^ENDC  %^ENDD  %^ENDE  %^ENDF  %^ENDG  %^ENDH ;
 Sgm = Vow Cns Orth   ; !!= * @CODE@

 
Definitions 

 WS = :* %^WS:0  :* ; 
 AccVow =  [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ]  ;
  
!! !!Rules

Rules


"ahl to ál, ahl to áal"
!! __@RULENAME@__ ahl changes to ál at the end of a stem verb when it is followed by an ending belonging to Set B, F, G or H

a:á <=> \AccVow Cns Cns _ h:0 l %>: [ %^ENDB:0 | %^ENDF:0 | %^ENDG:0 | %^ENDH:0 | %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ;

"ahl to ál, ahl to áal"
!h:0 <=> a: _ l %>: [%^ENDB:0 | %^ENDF:0 | %^ENDG:0 | %^ENDH:0 ] ;
!        a: 0: _ l %>: [ %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ;
!        _ l %>: %^DEF:0 ;

h:0 <=>  á: a  _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ g | á: a | %. á: ]  ; ! skyáalga 
         Cns a  _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ g |  á: a | á: n g | %. á: ]  ; !  áljalga
         Cns a 0:a _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ ' a | á: a  ]  ; !  áljalga 


"ahl to áal, part 2"
0:a <=> a: _ h: l %>: [ %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ; !

"s2 to j for DEF"
s2:j <=> _ Sgm:* %>: %^DEF:0 ; 

"aa to a for DEF"
a:0 <=> a _ Cns: %>: %^DEF:0 ; 
 
 
! Destressing

"Destressing rule"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - this should be a general rule, but we have problems of getting the variables to accept 0:Vow
Vx:Vy <=> [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:*  %>:  (Endings:) Sgm:* _  ;
          [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:* Vow: 0:Vow  Cns:+  %>:  (Endings:) Sgm:* _  ; 
          [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:* _ Sgm:* [ %>: | .#. ] ; !kúníida
 	where Vx in ( á é í ó ú )
 	      Vy in ( a e i o u )
 	      matched ;



!"g deletion on the suffix border"
!g:0 <=> _ %>: g ;

!sdlaagwaal:sdlaagulaay
